North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 3. Judicial Dissolution.

§ 55-14-30.
Grounds for judicial dissolution.

The superior court may dissolve a corporation:

In a proceeding by the Attorney General if it is established that (i) the corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud; or (ii) the corporation has, after written notice by the Attorney General given at least 20 days prior thereto, continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

In a proceeding by a shareholder if it is established that (i) the directors or those in control of the corporation are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the shareholders are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered, or the business and affairs of the corporation can no longer be conducted to the advantage of the shareholders generally, because of the deadlock; (ii) liquidation is reasonably necessary for the protection of the rights or interests of the complaining shareholder; (iii) the shareholders are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired; (iv) the corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or (v) a written agreement, whether embodied in the articles of incorporation or separate therefrom, entitles the complaining shareholder to liquidation or dissolution of the corporation at will or upon the occurrence of some event which has subsequently occurred, and all present shareholders, and all subscribers and transferees of shares, either are parties to such agreement or became a shareholder, subscriber or transferee with actual notice thereof;

In a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that (i) the creditor’s claim has been reduced to judgment and the execution on the judgment returned unsatisfied; or (ii) the corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor’s claim is due and owing and the corporation is insolvent; or

In a proceeding by the corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision.

History.

Code, ss. 604, 605, 619, 668, 669, 694; 1889, c. 533; 1901, c. 2, ss. 61, 62, 73; Rev., ss. 1196, 1198, 1203, 1204; C.S., ss. 1185, 1187, 1195; G.S., ss. 55-124, 55-126, 55-134; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 26; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-14-31.
Procedure for judicial dissolution.

Venue for a proceeding to dissolve a corporation lies in the county where a corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this State, its registered office) is or was last located.

It is not necessary to make shareholders parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the corporation.

In any proceeding brought by a shareholder under G.S. 55-14-30(2)(ii) in which the court determines that dissolution would be appropriate, the court shall not order dissolution if, after such determination, the corporation elects to purchase the shares of the complaining shareholder at their fair value, as determined in accordance with such procedures as the court may provide.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 26; 1973, c. 469, s. 41; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-14-32.
Receivership.

A court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or to manage, the business and affairs of the corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver. The court appointing a receiver has exclusive jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual or a domestic or foreign corporation (authorized to transact business in this State) as a receiver. The court may require the receiver to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Such powers may include without limitation the power:

To dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court;

(1a)

To sue and defend in his own name as receiver of the corporation in all courts of this State; and

To exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interests of its shareholders and creditors.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

The court from time to time during the receivership may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver and his counsel from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-14-33.
Decree of dissolution.

If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in

G.S. 55-14-30

exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Secretary of State, who shall file it.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation’s business and affairs in accordance with

G.S. 55-14-05

and the notification of claimants in accordance with

G.S. 55-14-06

and

G.S. 55-14-07

. The corporation’s name becomes available for use by another entity as provided in

G.S. 55D-21

.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 26; 1967, c. 823, s. 19; 1969, c. 965, s. 1; 1973, c. 469, s. 42; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2001-358, s. 19; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§§ 55-14-34 through 55-14-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.